Maryland, session 2025, HB1205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–504.1.
EXCEPT FOR INFORMATION THAT MAY BE PRIVILEGED OR CONFIDENTIAL, A
LOCAL DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE A PROSPECTIVE FOSTER PARENT
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1205*

HOUSE BILL 1205
INFORMATION ON THE MEDICAL, EDUCATIONAL, AND BEHAVIORAL HISTORY OF A
CHILD:
(1) THAT DIRECTLY RELATES TO THE CARE OF THE CHILD; AND
(2) THAT WOULD POSSIBLY AFFECT THE CARE PROVIDED BY A
PROSPECTIVE FOSTER PARENT.
5–525.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Sibling” means a brother or sister of the whole or half blood or by
adoption.
(3) “Treatment foster care home” means an out–of–home placement facility
that is part of a program designed and implemented by a child placement agency to provide
intensive casework and treatment in a family setting to children with special physical,
emotional, or behavioral needs.
(B) A LOCAL DEPARTMENT MAY PLACE UP TO FOUR CHILDREN IN AN
OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT UNDER § 5–525 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(b)] (C) (1) A local department shall place together siblings who are in an
out–of–home placement under § 5–525 of this subtitle if:
(i) it is in the best interests of the siblings to be placed together; and
(ii) placement of the siblings together does not conflict with a specific
health or safety regulation.
(2) If placement of the siblings together conflicts with a specific health or
safety regulation, the local department may place the siblings together if the local
department makes a written finding describing how placement of the siblings together
serves the best interests of the siblings.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order to place siblings
together the local department may place more than two children who require treatment in
an eligible treatment foster care home if:
(i) the local department makes a written finding explaining why
placement of the siblings together:
1. is in the best interests of the siblings; and

HOUSE BILL 1205 3
2. will not harm other children placed at the same treatment
foster care home; and
(ii) the local department notifies the Administration of the
placement.
[(c)] (D) (1) Any siblings who are separated due to a foster care or adoptive
placement may petition a court, including a juvenile court with jurisdiction over one or
more of the siblings, for reasonable sibling visitation rights.
(2) If a petitioner under this subsection petitions a court to issue a
visitation decree or to amend an order, the court:
(i) may hold a hearing to determine whether visitation is in the best
interest of the children;
(ii) shall weigh the relative interests of each child and base its
decision on the best interests of the children promoting the greatest welfare and least harm
to the children; and
(iii) may issue an appropriate order or decree.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.